Hawaii statutes.
[§704-407.5] Examination of defendant with
respect to physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect excluding penal
responsibility. (1) Whenever the defendant has filed a notice of
intention to rely on the defense of physical or mental disease, disorder, or
defect excluding penal responsibility, or there is reason to believe that the
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect of the defendant will or has
become an issue in the case, the court may order an examination as to the
defendant's physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect at the time of the
conduct alleged.

(2) The court shall appoint three qualified
examiners in felony cases and one qualified examiner in nonfelony cases to
examine and report upon the physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect of
the defendant at the time of the conduct. In felony cases, the court shall
appoint at least one psychiatrist and at least one licensed psychologist. The
third examiner may be a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or qualified
physician. One of the three examiners shall be a psychiatrist or licensed
psychologist designated by the director of health from within the department of
health. In nonfelony cases, the court may appoint as examiners either a
psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist. All examiners shall be appointed from
a list of certified examiners as determined by the department of health. The
court, in appropriate circumstances, may appoint an additional examiner or
examiners. The court may direct that one or more qualified physicians or
psychologists retained by the defendant be permitted to witness the
examination. As used in this section, the term "licensed
psychologist" includes psychologists exempted from licensure by section
465-3(a)(3) and "qualified physician" means a physician qualified by
the court for the specific evaluation ordered.

(3) An examination performed under this
section may employ any method that is accepted by the professions of medicine
or psychology for the examination of those alleged to be affected by a physical
or mental disease, disorder, or defect; provided that each examiner shall form
and render diagnoses and opinions upon the physical and mental condition of the
defendant independently from the other examiners, and the examiners, upon approval
of the court, may secure the services of clinical psychologists and other
medical or paramedical specialists to assist in the examination and diagnosis.

(4) For defendants charged with felonies, the
examinations for fitness to proceed under section 704-404 and penal
responsibility under this section shall be conducted separately unless a
combined examination has been ordered by the court upon a request by the
defendant or upon a showing of good cause to combine the examinations. When the
examinations are separate, the examination for penal responsibility under this
section shall not be ordered more than thirty days after a finding of fitness
to proceed. The report of the examination for fitness to proceed shall be
separate from the report of the examination for penal responsibility unless a
combined examination has been ordered. For defendants charged with offenses
other than felonies, a combined examination is permissible when ordered by the
court.

(5) The court may order the examination to
occur no sooner than one hundred twenty days of a finding of unfit to proceed
under section 704-404 upon a showing of good cause.

(6) The report of the examination for penal
responsibility shall include the following:

(a) A description of the nature of the examination;

(b) A diagnosis of the physical or mental condition
of the defendant;

(c) An opinion as to the extent, if any, to which
the capacity of the defendant to appreciate the wrongfulness of the defendant's
conduct or to conform the defendant's conduct to the requirements of law was
impaired at the time of the conduct alleged;

(d) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the
capacity of the defendant to have a particular state of mind that is required
to establish an element of the offense charged; and

(e) Where more than one examiner is appointed, a
statement that the diagnosis and opinion rendered were arrived at independently
of any other examiner, unless there is a showing to the court of a clear need
for communication between or among the examiners for clarification. A
description of the communication shall be included in the report. After all
reports are submitted to the court, examiners may confer without restriction.

(7) If the examination cannot be conducted by
reason of the unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination,
the report shall so state and shall include, if possible, an opinion as to
whether the unwillingness of the defendant was the result of physical or mental
disease, disorder, or defect.

(8) Three copies of the report of the
examination, including any supporting documents, shall be filed with the clerk
of the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered to the prosecuting
attorney and to counsel for the defendant.

(9) Any examiner shall be permitted to make a
separate explanation reasonably serving to clarify the examiner's diagnosis or
opinion.

(10) The court shall obtain all existing
relevant medical, mental health, social, police, and juvenile records,
including those expunged, and other pertinent records in the custody of public
agencies, notwithstanding any other statute, and make the records available for
inspection by the examiners in hard copy or digital format. The court may
order that the records so obtained be made available to the prosecuting
attorney and counsel for the defendant in either format, subject to conditions
the court determines appropriate; provided that juvenile records shall not be
made available unless constitutionally required. No further disclosure of
records shall be made except as permitted by law.

(11) All public agencies in possession of
relevant medical, mental health, social, police, and juvenile records, and any
other pertinent records of a defendant ordered to be examined under this
chapter, shall provide those records to the court, notwithstanding any other
state statute.

(12) The compensation of persons making or
assisting in the examination, other than those retained by a nonindigent
defendant, who are not undertaking the examination upon designation by the
director of health as part of their normal duties as employees of the State or
a county, shall be paid by the State.

(13) The time during which completion of an
examination pursuant to this section is pending shall be excluded in computing
the time for trial commencement. [L 2016, c 198, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §704-407.5

Act 198, Session Laws 2016, added this section when it
separated the examination for fitness to proceed of a defendant with respect to
physical or mental disease, disorder, or defect, from the examination for penal
responsibility of the defendant with respect to physical or mental disease,
disorder, or defect, with certain exceptions, in criminal prosecutions where
the defendant's capacity is at issue. The legislature found that under
§704-404, when a defendant's fitness to proceed comes into question, the
criminal proceedings are stopped, and the court must order a physical or mental
examination of the defendant to determine the defendant's fitness to proceed
and whether the defendant was penally responsible for the alleged crime. The
legislature further found that it is in the best interest of the defendants for
the examination process to proceed in a timely, expedient manner by separating
the fitness to stand trial and the penal responsibility components of
examinations. Conference Committee Report No. 153-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next